Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. Compulsory School Attendance.
§ 22.1-254.2.
Testing for high school equivalency; eligibility; guidelines.

The Board of Education shall establish a program of testing for high school equivalency through which a person may pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education through which persons may earn a high school equivalency certificate or may earn a diploma as provided in subsection F of § 22.1-253.13:4. The following persons may participate in the testing program:

Persons who are at least 18 years of age and not enrolled in public school or not otherwise meeting the school attendance requirements set forth in § 22.1-254;

Persons 16 years of age or older who have been instructed by their parents in their home pursuant to § 22.1-254.1 and who have completed such home school instruction;

Persons who have been excused from school attendance pursuant to subsections B and D of § 22.1-254;

Persons for whom an individual student alternative education plan has been granted pursuant to subsection E of § 22.1-254;

Persons 16 through 18 years of age who are housed in adult correctional facilities and who are actively pursuing a passing score on a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education but who are not enrolled in an individual student alternative education plan pursuant to subsection E of § 22.1-254;

Persons 16 years of age or older who have been expelled from school pursuant to §§ 22.1-277.06 through 22.1-277.08; and

Persons required by court order to participate in the testing program.Under no circumstances shall persons under the age of 16 be eligible for the testing program.

From such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose, local school boards shall implement programs of preparation and testing for high school equivalency consistent with guidelines to be developed by the Board of Education. Such guidelines shall include a provision that allows preparatory and testing programs to be offered jointly by two or more school boards.

History.

1989, c. 225; 1997, c. 458; 1999, cc. 488, 552; 2003, c. 688; 2004, cc. 251, 939, 955; 2006, c. 335; 2010, c. 605; 2014, c. 84.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 688, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 488 and 552 are identical, and rewrote the section, which formerly read: “The Board of Education may establish a program of testing for general educational development through which children sixteen years of age or older who have been instructed by their parents in their home pursuant to § 22.1-254.1 for three consecutive years and who have completed such home school instruction or who have been excused from school attendance pursuant to subdivisions B 1 and 2 of § 22.1-257 may earn a high school equivalency certificate.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 688, in subsection A, inserted “(GED)” and “or a diploma as provided in subsection E of § 22.1-253.13:4” in the first sentence of the introductory language, substituted “18 years” for “eighteen years” in subdivision 1, and substituted “16 years” for “sixteen years” in subdivision 2 and in the concluding paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 251 added subdivision A 5; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and substituted “subsection F” for “subsection E” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph in subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 335 added subdivisions A 6 and A 7 and made a related change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 605, in subdivision A 3, substituted “subsections B and D” for “subsections B and C”
and substituted “subsection E” for subsection D” in subdivisions A 4 and A 5.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in subsection A, substituted “high school equivalency through which a person may pass a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “general educational development (GED)” and inserted “may earn”; in subdivision A 5, substituted “a passing score on a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “a GED certificate”; in subsection B, substituted “high school equivalency” for “general educational development.”

§ 22.1-255.
Nonresident children.

Any person who has residing with him for a period of sixty days or more any child within the ages prescribed in § 22.1-254 whose parents or guardians reside in another state or the District of Columbia shall be subject to the provisions of § 22.1-254 and shall pay or cause to be paid any tuition charges for such child that may be required pursuant to § 22.1-5 or shall return such child to the home of his parents or legal guardians.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-220; 1958, c. 628; 1968, c. 178; 1976, cc. 681, 713; 1978, c. 140; 1980, c. 559.

§§ 22.1-256,
22.1-257.
Repealed by Acts 1999, cc. 488 and 552.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 22.1-256 and 22.1-257, exempting certain children from this article, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-275.3; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1968, c. 178; 1975, c. 558; 1976, cc. 681, 713; 1978, c. 518; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 540; 1985, c. 407; 1993, c. 903.

§ 22.1-258.
Appointment of attendance officers; notification when pupil fails to report to school; plan; conference; court proceedings.

Every school board shall have power to appoint one or more attendance officers, who shall be charged with the enforcement of the provisions of this article. Where no attendance officer is appointed by the school board, the division superintendent or his designee shall act as attendance officer.

Whenever any pupil fails to report to school on a regularly scheduled school day and no indication has been received by school personnel that the pupil’s parent is aware of and supports the pupil’s absence, a reasonable effort to notify by telephone the parent to obtain an explanation for the pupil’s absence shall be made by either the school principal or his designee, the attendance officer, other school personnel, or volunteers organized by the school administration for this purpose. Any such volunteers shall not be liable for any civil damages for any acts or omissions resulting from making such reasonable efforts to notify parents and obtain such explanation when such acts or omissions are taken in good faith, unless such acts or omissions were the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. This subsection shall not be construed to limit, withdraw, or overturn any defense or immunity already existing in statutory or common law or to affect any claim occurring prior to the effective date of this law. School divisions are encouraged to use noninstructional personnel for this notice.

Whenever any pupil fails to report to school for a total of five scheduled school days for the school year and no indication has been received by school personnel that the pupil’s parent is aware of and supports the pupil’s absence, and a reasonable effort to notify the parent has failed, the school principal or his designee shall make a reasonable effort to ensure that direct contact is made with the parent in person, through telephone conversation, or through the use of other communications devices to obtain an explanation for the pupil’s absence and to explain to the parent the consequences of continued nonattendance. The school principal or his designee, the pupil, and the pupil’s parent shall jointly develop a plan to resolve the pupil’s nonattendance. Such plan shall include documentation of the reasons for the pupil’s nonattendance.

If the pupil is absent for more than one additional day after direct contact with the pupil’s parent, and school personnel have received no indication that the pupil’s parent is aware of and supports the pupil’s absence, the school principal or his designee shall schedule a conference with the pupil, his parent, and school personnel. Such conference may include the attendance officer and other community service providers to resolve issues related to the pupil’s nonattendance. The conference shall be held no later than 10 school days after the tenth absence of the pupil, regardless of whether his parent approves of the conference. The conference team shall monitor the pupil’s attendance and may meet again as necessary to address concerns and plan additional interventions if attendance does not improve. In circumstances in which the parent is intentionally noncompliant with compulsory attendance requirements or the pupil is resisting parental efforts to comply with compulsory attendance requirements, the principal or his designee shall make a referral to the attendance officer. The attendance officer shall schedule a conference with the pupil and his parent within 10 school days and may (i) file a complaint with the juvenile and domestic relations district court alleging the pupil is a child in need of supervision as defined in § 16.1-228 or (ii) institute proceedings against the parent pursuant to §

18.2-371

or 22.1-262. In filing a complaint against the student, the attendance officer shall provide written documentation of the efforts to comply with the provisions of this section. In the event that both parents have been awarded joint physical custody pursuant to §

20-124.2

and the school has received notice of such order, both parents shall be notified at the last known addresses of the parents.

An attendance officer, or a division superintendent or his designee when acting as an attendance officer pursuant to § 22.1-258, may complete, sign, and file with the intake officer of the juvenile and domestic relations district court, on forms approved by the Supreme Court of Virginia, a petition for a violation of a school attendance order entered by the juvenile and domestic relations district court pursuant to § 16.1-278.5 in response to the filing of a petition alleging the pupil is a child in need of supervision as defined in § 16.1-228.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit in any way the authority of any attendance officer or division superintendent to seek immediate compliance with the compulsory school attendance law as set forth in this article.

Attendance officers, other school personnel or volunteers organized by the school administration for this purpose shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability in connection with the notice to parents of a pupil’s absence or failure to give such notice as required by this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.16; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 482; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1996, cc. 891, 916, 964; 1998, c. 620; 1999, c. 526; 2010, c. 597; 2018, cc. 713, 753; 2020, cc. 105, 106.

Cross references.

As to revocation or suspension of driving privileges for failure to comply with requirements of this section, see § 16.1-278.9.

Editor’s note.

Acts Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 36 D, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall encourage training of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court judges regarding the options available for court-ordered services for families in truancy cases prior to the initiation of other remedies.”

The 1999 amendment,

in the second paragraph, inserted “and supports” following “parent is aware of,” inserted “to obtain an explanation for the pupil’s absence” following “telephone the parent,” and added the second and third sentences, rewrote the former third paragraph, as the present third and fourth paragraph, which read: “Whenever any pupil fails to report to school for three consecutive school days, or for a total of five scheduled school days per month or an aggregate of seven scheduled school days per school calendar quarter, whichever occurs sooner, and no indication has been received by school personnel that the pupil’s parent is aware of the pupil’s absence, and a reasonable effort to notify the parent has failed, the school principal or his designee shall notify the parent by letter that such parent is requested to advise the school in writing of the reason for the pupil’s absence or to accompany the pupil upon his return to school to explain the reason for his absence. Upon the failure of the parent to so advise the school or to return the child to school within three school days of the date of the notice, the school principal or his designee shall notify the attendance officer or the division superintendent, as the case may be, who shall enforce the provisions of this article. In the event that both parents have been awarded joint physical custody pursuant to §

20-124.2

, and the school has received notice of such order, both parents shall be notified at the last known addresses of the parents,” and deleted “However” from the beginning of the fifth paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 597 twice inserted “or his designee”; inserted “either the school principal or his designee” preceding “the attendance officer” in the first sentence of the second paragraph; in the third paragraph, in the first sentence, inserted “or the attendance officer” following “or his designee” and deleted “by the attendance officer” following “telephone conversation” and inserted “school principal or his designee or the” preceding “attendance officer” in the next-to-last sentence; and in the fourth paragraph, inserted “either the school principal or his designee or” preceding “the attendance officer” in the first sentence and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 713 and 753 are identical, and in the third paragraph, deleted “or the attendance officer” following “or his designee” in the first and last sentences and substituted “in person, through telephone conversation, or through the use of other communications devices” for “either in person or through telephone conversation”; and rewrote the fourth paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 105 and 106 are identical, and inserted the fifth paragraph.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2818 Driver’s License Denial Order (Juvenile)/Driver’s License Suspension Order (Under Age Alcohol Violations).

§ 22.1-259.
Teachers to keep daily attendance records.

Every teacher in every school in the Commonwealth shall keep an accurate daily record of attendance of all children in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Board of Education. Such record shall, at all times, be open to any officer authorized to enforce the provisions of this article who may inspect or copy the same and shall be admissible in evidence in any prosecution for a violation of this article as prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-209, 22-275.15; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1964, c. 119; 1968, c. 178; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-260.
Reports of children enrolled and not enrolled; nonattendance.

Within 10 days after the opening of the school, each public school principal shall report to the division superintendent:

The name, age and grade of each student enrolled in the school, and the name and address of the student’s parent or guardian; and

To the best of the principal’s information, the name of each child subject to the provisions of this article who is not enrolled in school, with the name and address of the child’s parent or guardian.

At the end of each school year, each public school principal shall report to the division superintendent the number of students by grade level for whom a conference was scheduled as required by § 22.1-258. The division superintendent shall compile such grade level information for the division and provide such information to the Superintendent of Public Instruction annually.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-275.8, 22-275.9; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1980, c. 559; 1987, c. 374; 1988, c. 163; 1999, c. 526; 2003, c. 637; 2015, cc. 372, 666.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 372 and 666, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on August 1, 2015.”

The 1999 amendment

added subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 637 substituted “10” for “ten” in the introductory language of subsection A; in subdivision A 1, substituted “student” for “pupil,” and “student’s” for “pupil’s;” substituted “students” for “pupils” in subsection B; and in subsection C, substituted “90” for ‘’ninety” in the first sentence, substituted “students” for “individuals” in the second sentence, and rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “In any case in which an individual is ineligible, pursuant to these guidelines, to obtain a social security number, the superintendent or his designee may waive this requirement.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 372 and 666 are identical, effective August 1, 2015, and deleted subsection C, which read “For the purposes of this section, each student shall present a federal social security number within 90 days of his enrollment. The Board of Education shall, after consulting with the Social Security Administration, promulgate guidelines for determining which students are eligible to obtain social security numbers. In any case in which a student is ineligible, pursuant to these guidelines, to obtain a social security number or the parent is unwilling to present such number, the superintendent or his designee may assign another identifying number to the student or waive this requirement.”

§ 22.1-261.
Attendance officer to make list of children not enrolled; duties of attendance officer.

The attendance officer or the division superintendent or his designee shall check the reports submitted pursuant to subsection A of § 22.1-260 with reports from the State Registrar of Vital Records and Health Statistics. From these reports and from any other reliable source the attendance officer or the division superintendent or his designee shall, within five days after receiving all reports submitted pursuant to subsection A of § 22.1-260, make a list of the names of children who are not enrolled in any school and who are not exempt from school attendance. It shall be the duty of the attendance officer, on behalf of the local school board, to investigate all cases of nonenrollment and, when no valid reason is found therefor, to notify the parent, guardian or other person having control of the child to require the attendance of such child at the school within three days from the date of such notice.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.10; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1980, c. 559; 1996, cc. 891, 964; 1999, c. 526; 2010, cc. 386, 597, 629.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, cc. 386 and 629, cl. 4 provides: “That the estimate of population provided by the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service at the University of Virginia be used as the basis for apportionment and distribution of sales tax revenues to public school divisions beginning July 1, 2012.”

The 1999 amendment

inserted “subsection A of” in the first and second sentences.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 386 and 629 are identical, and deleted “with the last school census and” following “subsection A of § 22.1-260.”

The 2010 amendment by c. 597 inserted “or his designee” following “division superintendent” in the first and second sentences.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-262.
Complaint to court when parent fails to comply with law.

A list of persons notified pursuant to § 22.1-261 shall be sent by the attendance officer to the appropriate school principal. If the parent (i) fails to comply with the provisions of § 22.1-261 within the time specified in the notice or (ii) fails to comply with the provisions of § 22.1-254, it shall be the duty of the attendance officer, with the knowledge and approval of the division superintendent, to make complaint against the pupil’s parent in the name of the Commonwealth before the juvenile and domestic relations district court. If proceedings are instituted against the parent for failure to comply with the provisions of § 22.1-258, the attendance officer is to provide documentation to the court regarding the school division’s compliance with § 22.1-258. In addition thereto, such child may be proceeded against as a child in need of services or a child in need of supervision as provided in Chapter 11 (§ 16.1-226 et seq.) of Title 16.1.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.11; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1976, c. 98; 1980, c. 559; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1996, cc. 891, 964; 1999, c. 526; 2018, cc. 713, 753.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “notified pursuant to § 22.1-261” for “so notified” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “(i) fails to comply with the provisions of § 22.1-261 within the time specified in the notice; or (ii) fails to comply with the provisions of § 22.1-254; or (iii) refuses to participate in the development of the plan to resolve the student’s nonattendance or in the conference provided for in § 22.1-258” for “guardian, or other person having control of the child fails to comply with the law within the time specified in the notice,” and inserted “against the pupil’s parent” following “make complaint,” and inserted the third sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 713 and 753 are identical, and in the second sentence, deleted “or (iii) refuses to participate in the development of the plan to resolve the student’s nonattendance or in the conference provided for in § 22.1-258” preceding “it shall be” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-263.
Violation constitutes misdemeanor.

Any person violating the provisions of either § 22.1-254, except for clause (ii) of subsection A, §§ 22.1-255, 22.1-258, 22.1-267, or the parental responsibility provisions relating to compulsory school attendance included in § 22.1-279.3, shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. Upon a finding that a person knowingly and willfully violated any provision of § 22.1-254, except for clause (ii) of subsection A, or any provision of §§ 22.1-255, 22.1-258, or § 22.1-267 and that such person has been convicted previously of a violation of any provision of § 22.1-254, except for clause (ii) of subsection A, or any provision of §§ 22.1-255, 22.1-258 or § 22.1-267, such person shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.5; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1976, c. 283; 1980, c. 559; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1996, cc. 891, 964; 1999, cc. 488, 526, 552; 2004, c. 573.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 and 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to eligibility for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families being conditioned on compliance with compulsory school attendance laws, see §

63.2-606

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 797, which amended this section, in cl. 3 provided that the provisions of the 1990 act would become effective July 1, 1992. However, Acts 1991, c. 295, cl. 1 amended Acts 1990, c. 797, cl. 3, to make the amendatory provisions of the 1990 act effective July 1, 1991.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by c. 488 and 552 are identical, and substituted “clause (ii) of subsection A” for “subsection E” in three places.

The 1999 amendment by c. 526 substituted “§§ 22.1-255, 22.1-258” for “§ 22.1-255” in three places.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 573, in the first sentence, deleted “or §” preceding “22.1-267” and inserted “or the parental responsibility provisions relating to compulsory school attendance included in § 22.1-279.3.”

§ 22.1-264.
Misdemeanor to make false statements as to age.

Any person who makes a false statement concerning the age of a child between the ages set forth in § 22.1-254 for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.18; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1968, c. 178; 1976, cc. 283, 681, 713; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 22.1-264.1.
Misdemeanor to make false statements as to school division or attendance zone residency; penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement concerning the residency of a child, as determined by § 22.1-3, in a particular school division or school attendance zone, for the purposes of (i) avoiding the tuition charges authorized by § 22.1-5 or (ii) enrollment in a school outside the attendance zone in which the student resides, shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor and shall be liable to the school division in which the child was enrolled as a result of such false statements for tuition charges, pursuant to § 22.1-5, for the time the student was enrolled in such school division.

History.

2005, c. 178; 2006, c. 143.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 143 added the language beginning “and shall be liable to the school division” at the end.

§ 22.1-265.
Inducing children to absent themselves.

Any person who induces or attempts to induce any child to be absent unlawfully from school or who knowingly employs or harbors, while school is in session, any child absent unlawfully shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and may be subject to the penalties provided by subdivision 5 a of subsection B of § 16.1-278.5 or §

18.2-371

. Upon a finding that a person knowingly and willfully violated the provisions of this section and that such person has been convicted previously of a violation of this section, such person shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.19; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1976, c. 283; 1980, c. 559; 1990, c. 797; 1991, cc. 295, 534; 1996, cc. 891, 916, 964.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 and 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 797, which amended this section, in cl. 3 provided that the provisions of the 1990 act would become effective July 1, 1992. However, Acts 1991, c. 295, cl. 1 amended Acts 1990, c. 797, cl. 3, to make the amendatory provisions of the 1990 act effective July 1, 1991.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-266.
Law-enforcement officers and truant children.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 16.1-246, any law-enforcement officer as defined in §

9.1-101

or any attendance officer may pick up any child who (i) is reported to be truant from a public school by a school principal or division superintendent or (ii) the law-enforcement officer or attendance officer reasonably determines to be a public school student and by reason of the child’s age and circumstances is either truant from public school or has been expelled from school and has been required to attend an alternative education program pursuant to § 22.1-254 or § 22.1-277.2:1, and may deliver such child to the appropriate public school, alternative education program, or truancy center and personnel thereof without charging the parent or guardian of such child with a violation of any provision of law.

Any such law-enforcement officer or attendance officer shall not be liable for any civil damages for any acts or omissions resulting from picking up or delivering a public school child as provided in subsection A when such acts or omissions are within the scope of the employment of such law-enforcement officer or attendance officer and are taken in good faith, unless such acts or omissions were the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. This subsection shall not be construed to limit, withdraw or overturn any defense or immunity already existing in statutory or common law or to affect any claim occurring prior to the effective date of this law.

For the purposes of this section, “truancy center” means a facility or site operated by a school division, sometimes jointly with the local law-enforcement agency, and designated for receiving children who have been retrieved by a law-enforcement officer or attendance officer for truancy from school.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.11:1; 1976, c. 692; 1978, c. 215; 1980, c. 559; 1999, cc. 395, 1023; 2001, cc. 688, 820.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 395 added the subsection A designator, inserted “(i),” inserted “a public” preceding “school by a school,” substituted “(ii)” for “who,” inserted “to be a public school student and” preceding “by reason,” inserted “public” preceding “school, and may,” substituted “appropriate public school or truancy center” for “appropriate school”; and added subsections B and C.

The 1999 amendment by c. 1023 added subsection A designator, inserted “(i),” inserted “a public,” substituted “(ii)” for “who,” inserted “to be a public school student and” preceding “by reason of the child’s age,” inserted “either” following “the child’s age and circumstances,” inserted “public” following “truant from,” inserted “or has been expelled from school and has been required to attend an alternative education program pursuant to § 22.1-277.1,” inserted “public” following “such child to the appropriate” and inserted “alternative education program, or truancy center”; and added subsections B and C.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 688 and 820 substituted “§ 22.1-254 or § 22.1-277.2:1” for “§ 22.1-277.1” in clause (ii) of subsection A.

§ 22.1-267.
Proceedings against habitually absent child.

Any child permitted by any parent, guardian, or other person having control thereof to be habitually absent from school contrary to the provisions of this article may be proceeded against as a child in need of supervision as provided in Chapter 11 (§ 16.1-226 et seq.) of Title 16.1.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.20; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1976, c. 98; 1980, c. 559; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 797, which amended this section, in cl. 3 provided that the provisions of the 1990 act would become effective July 1, 1992. However, Acts 1991, c. 295, cl. 1 amended Acts 1990, c. 797, cl. 3, to make the amendatory provisions of the 1990 act effective July 1, 1991.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-268.
Duty of attorneys for the Commonwealth to prosecute cases arising under article; jurisdiction of offenses.

It shall be the duty of the attorneys for the Commonwealth of the several counties and cities to prosecute all cases arising under this article. Juvenile and domestic relations district courts shall have exclusive original jurisdiction for the trial of such cases.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.21; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1980, c. 559.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

§ 22.1-269.
Board to enforce.

The Board of Education shall have the authority and it shall be its duty to see that the provisions of this article are properly enforced throughout the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-275.23; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 72; 1968, c. 178; 1980, c. 559.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-269.1.
Alternative attendance programs.

The Board of Education shall promulgate regulations for the voluntary participation of school divisions in programs to allow each school-age child to receive educational services at another public school, either in the division in which the child resides or in another division, as selected by the child’s parent or guardian. Each public school in a school division participating in an alternative attendance program shall be eligible to participate in an alternative attendance program unless exceptional circumstances, as defined by the Board of Education, render the participation of the school contrary to public interest.

The Board’s regulations shall be promulgated under the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions which address the following: the required acknowledgement by a local school of its decision to participate in an alternative attendance program, including school board resolutions for intradistrict programs and agreements between divisions participating in interdistrict programs; the equitable allocation of places to accommodate students when there are insufficient places to serve such students; transportation and school bus scheduling needs within the local school divisions; school enrollment capacity, class size, pupil-teacher ratios, and staffing levels for related instructional, administrative, and supervisory personnel as required by the Standards of Quality and the Standards for Accrediting Public Schools; the adequacy of school resources to accommodate an increase in student enrollment, grade level designations, and course offerings; the enrollment of students whose education is subject to an individualized education plan (I.E.P.) as required under P.L. 94-142 as amended; the preservation of the uniqueness of schools established for particular educational purposes; the fiscal impact of accommodating parental preference on local school divisions; in the case of interdistrict attendance programs, the establishment of tuition charges authorized by § 22.1-5; and the need to maintain racial balance in the public schools. The regulations shall also establish the value of educational services, based on consideration of per pupil expenditures and state aid in the affected school. Any local school board which has been ordered by a state or federal court to achieve racial balance in its public schools shall maintain such racial balance when accommodating preference in the assignment of children to a school.

From such funds as may be appropriated, the Board shall provide for the independent evaluation of this alternative attendance program and shall submit the evaluation to the Governor, the Senate, and the House of Delegates by January 1 of each year.

History.

1993, c. 947.

Editor’s note.

For Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975 (P.L. 94-142), see now 20 U.S.C.S. § 1401 et seq.